Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [142B.68] CHILD CARE CENTER PARENT ACCESS TO PROGRAM. new text end new text begin An enrolled child's parent or guardian must have access to the child at any time the child is in attendance at a child care center unless a court order or other legal documentation restricts access to the child. A copy of any court order or legal documentation must be kept in the child's record. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [142B.69] CHILD CARE CENTER REQUIREMENTS FOR FURNISHINGS, EQUIPMENT, AND MATERIALS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin General requirement. new text end new text begin (a) A child care center must have furnishings, equipment, and materials as required under this section. new text end new text begin (b) The furnishings and equipment must not be hazardous objects and must be: new text end new text begin (1) durable, in good repair, and structurally sound and stable; new text end new text begin (2) free of sharp edges, dangerous protrusions, points where extremities of a child could be pinched or crushed, and openings or angles that could trap part of a child; new text end new text begin (3) appropriate for the age and size of children who use the furnishings and equipment; and new text end new text begin (4) used in accordance with the manufacturer's instructions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Cognitive development equipment and materials" means equipment and materials designed to enhance components of intellectual development, such as problem-solving abilities, observation skills, group skills, and symbol recognition. new text end new text begin (c) "Construction or building materials" means equipment and materials to allow children to build, stack, create, or construct something, such as building blocks, natural materials like sticks or stones, geometric solids, and other connecting or stacking toys. new text end new text begin (d) "Dramatic play equipment" or "practical life activity equipment" means equipment, such as dress-up clothes, large or miniature play sets, figures, and small and large building blocks that can be used to design a setting or space that stimulates the child's imagination and encourages role-playing and learning practical life skills. Practical life skills teach children how to take care of the space around them and can include setting the table, how to water and care for plants, and how to clean the table. new text end new text begin (e) "Gross motor or large muscle equipment" means equipment that is designed to enhance large muscle development and coordination, such as outdoor playground equipment, large boxes, large wheel toys, pull toys, balls, jump ropes, and rocking boats. new text end new text begin (f) "Manipulative equipment" means equipment that is designed to enhance fine motor development and coordination, such as pegs and peg boards, puzzles, beads and strings, and interlocking plastic forms. new text end new text begin (g) "Sensory or tactile stimulation materials" means equipment, other than pictures, that has different shapes, colors, and textures that are designed to stimulate the child's visual and tactile senses, such as sand and water activity materials, swatches of different textures of cloth, and wooden or plastic items of different shapes and colors. new text end new text begin (h) "Set" means a collection of toys, items, or materials of sufficient quantity to allow for a single child to engage in meaningful play. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Accessibility of equipment. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided under paragraph (b), the center must make materials and equipment accessible to children during all hours of operation and in sufficient quantity to serve the number of children in attendance that day. new text end new text begin (b) Art materials and musical or rhythm instruments may be stored in locations that are not accessible to children when the materials and instruments are not being used but still must be made available at least once daily. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Requirements for infants. new text end new text begin (a) A center serving infants must have, at a minimum, the following furnishings: new text end new text begin (1) one area rug, carpeted area, or other soft floor covering per classroom; new text end new text begin (2) a variety of nonfolding, child-size chairs, including infant seats and high chairs, with at least one per child or a minimum of four per group; new text end new text begin (3) one changing table for every group of 12 infants and each additional group of 12 or fewer infants; new text end new text begin (4) one hands-free, covered diaper container per changing table; new text end new text begin (5) one crib and waterproof mattress per child; new text end new text begin (6) one linear foot of low, open shelving per child and within reach of children; and new text end new text begin (7) evacuation cribs in sufficient quantity to evacuate the number of infants the program is licensed to serve. new text end new text begin (b) A center serving infants must have, at a minimum, the following equipment: new text end new text begin (1) one music source per classroom and music selections appropriate for the music source; new text end new text begin (2) two single strollers or one multicapacity stroller or wagon; new text end new text begin (3) two pieces of infant mobility equipment that promote the infant's movement; new text end new text begin (4) one book per child; new text end new text begin (5) six building or stacking materials per group; new text end new text begin (6) two pieces of manipulative equipment per infant, such as shape toys and clutch balls; new text end new text begin (7) one mirror at least 12 inches by 36 inches in size, made of plexiglass or a similar plastic or of safety glass, per group; new text end new text begin (8) four music-making toys per group; new text end new text begin (9) four sensory or tactile stimulation items per group; and new text end new text begin (10) play materials representing a diversity of special needs, disabilities, and cultural and ethnic groups. new text end new text begin (c) A center serving infants must have, at a minimum, the following supplies: new text end new text begin (1) two sets of sheets for each crib; new text end new text begin (2) an adequate amount of disposable paper for the changing table; new text end new text begin (3) an adequate amount of diapers; new text end new text begin (4) an adequate amount of facial tissue; new text end new text begin (5) an adequate amount of single-service towels; and new text end new text begin (6) an adequate amount of liquid hand soap. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Requirements for toddlers. new text end new text begin (a) A center serving toddlers must have, at a minimum, the following furnishings: new text end new text begin (1) one area rug, carpeted area, or other soft floor covering per classroom; new text end new text begin (2) one nonfolding, child-size chair, including high chairs, per child; new text end new text begin (3) one changing table for every group of 14 toddlers and each additional group of 14 or fewer toddlers; new text end new text begin (4) one hands-free, covered diaper container per changing table; new text end new text begin (5) one cot per child, except that mats are acceptable for programs operating during the day for less than five hours; new text end new text begin (6) one linear foot of low, open shelving per child and within reach of children; and new text end new text begin (7) child-size tables with sufficient space for each child based on the licensed capacity of the center. new text end new text begin (b) A center serving toddlers must have, at a minimum, the following equipment: new text end new text begin (1) arts and crafts supplies, such as clay or play dough, tempera or finger paints, colored and white paper, paste, collage materials, paint brushes, washable felt-tip markers, crayons, blunt scissors, and smocks; new text end new text begin (2) one book per child; new text end new text begin (3) two sets of construction or building materials per group; new text end new text begin (4) three pieces of dramatic play equipment or sets of Montessori Practical Life equipment per group, such as a play kitchen, a woodworking bench, or doll furnishings; new text end new text begin (5) materials and accessories as needed to carry out the theme of the activities under clause (4), such as play food, pots and pans, dishes, or Montessori Practical Life exercises; new text end new text begin (6) one double easel or art-making station or area per group; new text end new text begin (7) three pieces of durable, indoor, gross motor or large muscle equipment per group; new text end new text begin (8) three pieces of durable, outdoor, gross motor or large muscle equipment per group; new text end new text begin (9) one set of cognitive developmental equipment and materials, such as puzzles and matching games, per child; new text end new text begin (10) two sets of manipulative equipment per child, such as interlocking plastic forms; new text end new text begin (11) seven musical or rhythm instruments per group; new text end new text begin (12) one mirror at least 12 inches by 36 inches in size, made of plexiglass or a similar plastic or of safety glass, per group; new text end new text begin (13) one music source per classroom and music selections appropriate for the music source; new text end new text begin (14) four sensory or tactile stimulation items per group; and new text end new text begin (15) play materials representing a diversity of special needs, disabilities, and cultural and ethnic groups. new text end new text begin (c) A center serving toddlers must have, at a minimum, an adequate amount of the following supplies: new text end new text begin (1) disposable paper for the changing table; new text end new text begin (2) diapers; new text end new text begin (3) facial tissue; new text end new text begin (4) single-service towels; and new text end new text begin (5) liquid hand soap. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Requirements for preschoolers. new text end new text begin (a) A center serving preschoolers must have, at a minimum, the following furnishings: new text end new text begin (1) one area rug, carpeted area, or other soft floor covering per classroom; new text end new text begin (2) one nonfolding, child-size chair per child; new text end new text begin (3) one cot per child, except that mats are acceptable for programs operating during the day for less than five hours; new text end new text begin (4) two square feet of wall or bulletin board display space per child, one-half at child's eye level; new text end new text begin (5) one partially enclosed space equipped for quiet activity per group; new text end new text begin (6) one linear foot of low, open shelving per child and within reach of children; and new text end new text begin (7) child-size tables with sufficient space for each child based on the licensed capacity of the center. new text end new text begin (b) A center serving preschoolers must have, at a minimum, the following equipment: new text end new text begin (1) arts and crafts supplies, such as clay or play dough, tempera or finger paints, colored and white paper, paste, collage materials, paint brushes, washable felt-tip markers, crayons, blunt scissors, and smocks; new text end new text begin (2) two books per child; new text end new text begin (3) four sets of construction or building materials per group; new text end new text begin (4) five pieces of dramatic play equipment or sets of Montessori Practical Life equipment per group, such as a play kitchen, a woodworking bench, or doll furnishings; new text end new text begin (5) materials and accessories required as needed to carry out the theme of the activity under clause (4), such as play food, pots and pans, dishes, or Montessori Practical Life exercises; new text end new text begin (6) one double easel or art-making station or area per group; new text end new text begin (7) three pieces of durable, indoor, gross motor or large muscle equipment per group; new text end new text begin (8) three pieces of durable, outdoor, gross motor or large muscle equipment per group; new text end new text begin (9) one set of cognitive developmental equipment and materials, such as puzzles and matching games, per child; new text end new text begin (10) two sets of manipulative equipment per child, such as puzzles or interlocking plastic forms or blocks; new text end new text begin (11) seven musical or rhythm instruments per group; new text end new text begin (12) pictures at child's eye level, mobiles, and other items as needed to create a pleasant environment and provide sensory stimulation; new text end new text begin (13) one mirror at least 12 inches by 36 inches in size, made of plexiglass or a similar plastic or of safety glass, per group; new text end new text begin (14) one music source per classroom and music selections appropriate for the music source; new text end new text begin (15) four sensory or tactile stimulation items per group; and new text end new text begin (16) play materials representing a diversity of special needs, disabilities, and cultural and ethnic groups. new text end new text begin (c) A center serving preschoolers must have, at a minimum, an adequate amount of the following supplies: new text end new text begin (1) facial tissue; new text end new text begin (2) single-service towels; and new text end new text begin (3) liquid hand soap. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Requirements for school-age children. new text end new text begin (a) A center serving school-age children must have, at a minimum, the following furnishings: new text end new text begin (1) one area rug, carpeted area, or other soft floor covering per classroom; new text end new text begin (2) two square feet of wall or bulletin board display space per child, one-half at child's eye level; new text end new text begin (3) one nonfolding, child-size chair per child; new text end new text begin (4) one partially enclosed space equipped for quiet activity per group; new text end new text begin (5) one linear foot of low, open shelving per child and within reach of children; and new text end new text begin (6) child-size tables with sufficient space for each child based on the licensed capacity of the center. new text end new text begin (b) A center serving school-age children must have, at a minimum, the following equipment: new text end new text begin (1) arts and crafts supplies, such as clay or play dough, tempera or finger paints, colored and white paper, paste, collage materials, paint brushes, washable felt-tip markers, crayons, blunt scissors, and smocks; new text end new text begin (2) two books per child; new text end new text begin (3) four sets of construction or building materials per group; new text end new text begin (4) three pieces of dramatic play equipment or sets of Montessori Practical Life equipment per group, such as a play kitchen, a woodworking bench, or doll furnishings; new text end new text begin (5) materials and accessories required as needed to carry out the theme of the activity under clause (4), such as play food, pots and pans, dishes, or Montessori Practical Life exercises; new text end new text begin (6) three pieces of durable, outdoor, gross motor or large muscle equipment per group; new text end new text begin (7) one set of cognitive developmental equipment and materials, such as puzzles and matching games, per child; new text end new text begin (8) five sets of manipulative equipment per child, such as puzzles or interlocking plastic forms or blocks; new text end new text begin (9) pictures at child's eye level, mobiles, and other items as needed to create a pleasant environment and provide sensory stimulation; new text end new text begin (10) five musical or rhythm instruments per group; new text end new text begin (11) one music source per classroom and music selections appropriate for the music source; new text end new text begin (12) ten pieces of sports or recreational equipment, such as bats, balls, hoops, and jump ropes, per group; and new text end new text begin (13) play materials representing a diversity of special needs, disabilities, and cultural and ethnic groups. new text end new text begin (c) A center serving school-age children must have, at a minimum, an adequate amount of the following supplies: new text end new text begin (1) facial tissue; new text end new text begin (2) single-service towels; and new text end new text begin (3) liquid hand soap. new text end